District of Columbia statutes.
5-1055

Payments of penalties and collection of debts.

Penalties assessed against a member in conditional retirement as provided in §  5-1054 shall be treated as a debt owed to the District of Columbia government, pursuant to § 1-629.03, and may be collected by the District of Columbia government, pursuant to § 1-629.04, or by any other means authorized by law.

History

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 515
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-236, § 2(b), 62 DCR 485